District of Columbia statutes.
23-1324

Appeal from conditions of release.

(a)

A person who is detained, or whose release on a condition requiring him to return to custody after specified hours is continued, after review of his application pursuant to § 23-1321(c)(4) by a judicial officer, other than a judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense with which he is charged or a judge of a United States court of appeals or a Justice of the Supreme Court, may move the court having original jurisdiction over the offense with which he is charged to amend the order. Such motion shall be determined promptly.

(b)

In any case in which a person is detained after (1) a court denies a motion under subsection (a) to amend an order imposing conditions of release, (2) conditions of release have been imposed or amended by a judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged, or (3) he is ordered detained or an order for his detention has been permitted to stand by a judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense charged, an appeal may be taken to the court having appellate jurisdiction over such court. Any order so appealed shall be affirmed if it is supported by the proceedings below. If the order is not so supported, the court may remand the case for a further hearing, or may, with or without additional evidence, order the person released pursuant to section 23-1321(a). The appeal shall be determined promptly.

(c)

In any case in which a judicial officer other than a judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense with which a person is charged orders his release with or without setting terms or conditions of release, or denies a motion for the pretrial detention of a person, the United States attorney may move the court having original jurisdiction over the offense to amend or revoke the order. Such motion shall be considered promptly.

(d)

In any case in which —

(1)

a person is released, with or without the setting of terms or conditions of release, or a motion for the pretrial detention of a person is denied, by a judge of the court having original jurisdiction over the offense with which the person is charged, or

(2)

a judge of a court having such original jurisdiction does not grant the motion of the United States attorney filed pursuant to subsection (c),

the United States attorney may appeal to the court having appellate jurisdiction over such court. Any order so appealed shall be affirmed if it is supported by the proceedings below. If the order is not so supported, (A) the court may remand the case for a further hearing, (B) with or without additional evidence, change the terms or conditions of release, or (C) in cases in which the United States attorney requested pretrial detention pursuant to sections 23-1322 and 23-1323 , order such detention.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 647, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)
July 3, 1992, D.C. Law 9-125, § 5, 39 DCR 2134

Section References

This section is referenced in § 23-1325.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-1324.
1973 Ed., § 23-1324.